Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1789.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The definition of "personal financial information" in section 102 of the act of February 14, 2008 (P.L.6, No.3), known as the Right-to-Know Law, is amended to read:Section 102. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:12345678910111213141516171819202122 * * *"Personal financial information." An individual's personal credit, charge or debit card information; bank or other financial institution account information; bank, credit or financial statements; account or PIN numbers; account passwords; IRS form W-2 or its equivalent; benefit election information other than an election to become a member of the State Employees' Retirement System, the Public School Employees' Retirement System, the Pennsylvania Municipal Retirement System or other retirement plan for employees of the Commonwealth or any of its political subdivisions; contributions to retirement plans or other investment options; contributions toward the cost of health care benefits or other benefits; contributions to charitable organizations and other information relating to an individual's personal finances.* * *Section 2. Section 708(b)(6) and (c) of the act are amended and subsection (b) is amended by adding a paragraph to read:Section 708. Exceptions for public records.* * *(b) Exceptions.--Except as provided in subsections (c) and (d), the following are exempt from access by a requester under this act:* * *(6) (i) The following personal identification information:(A) A record containing all or part of a person's Social Security number, driver's license number, personal financial information, home, cellular or personal telephone numbers, personal e-20250HB1789PN2199 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 mail addresses, employee number or other confidential personal identification number.(B) A spouse's name, marital status or beneficiary or dependent information, including the number, names and ages of an employee's dependents.(C) The home address of a law enforcement officer or judge.(ii) Nothing in this paragraph shall preclude the release of the name, position, salary, actual compensation or other payments or expenses, employment contract, employment-related contract or agreement and length of service of a public official or an agency employee.(iii) An agency may redact the name or other identifying information relating to an individual performing an undercover or covert law enforcement activity from a record.(iv) Nothing in this paragraph shall prevent the disclosure of employer costs or aggregated data of employee costs related to retirement benefits, health care benefits or other benefits or the disclosure of options made available to employees regarding retirement benefits, health care benefits or other benefits.* * *(31) (i) An agency's financial institution account number, routing number, credit card number or PIN number.(ii) An agency shall redact to the extent necessary to protect the security of the agency's account information, account number, routing number, credit card number or PIN number, the number from a record.20250HB1789PN2199 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (c) Financial records.--The exceptions set forth in subsection (b) shall not apply to financial records, except that an agency may redact that portion of a financial record protected under subsection (b)(1), (2), (3), (4), (5), (6), (16) [or], (17) or (31). An agency shall not disclose the identity of an individual performing an undercover or covert law enforcement activity.* * *Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1789PN2199 - 4 - 123456789